Hawaii statutes.
§11-5 Employees. (a) Pursuant to
section 11-1.55, the chief election officer may employ a staff with or without
regard to chapter 76 at the discretion of the chief election officer, and
without regard to chapter 89 and section 28-8.3. The office of elections staff
may:

(1) Supervise state elections;

(2) Maximize registration of eligible voters
throughout the State;

(3) Maintain data concerning registered voters,
elections, apportionment, and districting; and

(4) Perform other duties as prescribed by law.

The chief election officer or county clerk may
employ precinct officials and other election employees as the chief election
officer or county clerk may find necessary, none of whom shall be subject to
chapters 76 and 89.

(b) Notwithstanding chapters 103 and 103D, the
chief election officer may contract with community organizations, school
booster clubs, and nonprofit organizations for the provision and compensation
of precinct officials and other election related personnel, services, and
activities; provided that to be eligible to enter into a contract, the
organization or club shall have received a tax clearance certificate from the
department of taxation and shall not be a political action committee or
organized for a political purpose. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217,
§1(c); am L 1977, c 199, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1995, c 71, §1; am L Sp 1995, c
27, §§5, 15; am L 1999, c 141, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2004, c 57, §3;
am L 2005, c 201, §1 and c 202, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next